Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 1
General Provisions

§ 28-12-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “Uniform Commercial Code-Leases.”

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-101, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977.

§ 28-12-102. Scope.

This chapter applies to any transaction, regardless of form, that creates a lease.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-102, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 287.

§ 28-12-103. Definitions and index of definitions.

In this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Buyer in ordinary course of business” means a person who in good faith and without knowledge that the sale to him is in violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold interest of a third party in the goods, buys in ordinary course from a person in the business of selling goods of that kind but does not include a pawnbroker. “Buying” may be for cash or by exchange of other property or on secured or unsecured credit and includes acquiring goods or documents of title under a preexisting contract for sale but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.

“Cancellation” occurs when either party puts an end to the lease contract for default by the other party.

“Commercial unit” means such a unit of goods as by commercial usage is a single whole for purposes of lease and division of which materially impairs its character or value on the market or in use. A commercial unit may be a single article, as a machine, or a set of articles, as a suite of furniture or a line of machinery, or a quantity, as a gross or carload, or any other unit treated in use or in the relevant market as a single whole.

“Conforming goods or performance under a lease contract” means goods or performance that is in accordance with the obligations under the lease contract.

“Consumer lease” means a lease that a lessor regularly engaged in the business of leasing or selling makes to a lessee who is an individual and who takes under the lease primarily for a personal, family or household purpose, if the total payments to be made under the lease contract, excluding payments for options to renew or buy, do not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

“Fault” means wrongful act, omission, breach or default.

“Finance lease” means a lease with respect to which:

The lessor does not select, manufacture, or supply the goods;

The lessor acquires the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods in connection with the lease; and

One (1) of the following occurs:

The lessee receives a copy of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods before signing the lease contract;

The lessee’s approval of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods is a condition to effectiveness of the lease contract;

The lessee, before signing the lease contract, receives an accurate and complete statement designating the promises and warranties, and any disclaimers of warranties, limitations or modifications of remedies, or liquidated damages, including those of a third party, such as the manufacturer of the goods, provided to the lessor by the person supplying the goods in connection with or as part of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods; or

If the lease is not a consumer lease, the lessor, before the lessee signs the lease contract, informs the lessee in writing:

“Goods” means all things that are movable at the time of identification to the lease contract, or are fixtures (section 28-12-309, Idaho Code), but the term does not include money, documents, instruments, accounts, chattel paper, general intangibles, or minerals or the like, including oil and gas, before extraction. The term also includes the unborn young of animals.

“Installment lease contract” means a lease contract that authorizes or requires the delivery of goods in separate lots to be separately accepted, even though the lease contract contains a clause “each delivery is a separate lease” or its equivalent.

“Lease” means a transfer of the right to possession and use of goods for a term in return for consideration, but a sale, including a sale on approval or a sale or return, or retention or creation of a security interest is not a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublease.

“Lease agreement” means the bargain, with respect to the lease, of the lessor and the lessee in fact as found in their language or by implication from other circumstances including course of dealing or usage of trade or course of performance as provided in this chapter. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublease agreement.

“Lease contract” means the total legal obligation that results from the lease agreement as affected by this chapter and any other applicable rules of law. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublease contract.

“Leasehold interest” means the interest of the lessor or the lessee under a lease contract.

“Lessee” means a person who acquires the right to possession and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublessee.

“Lessee in ordinary course of business” means a person who in good faith and without knowledge that the lease to him is in violation of the ownership rights or security interest or leasehold interest of a third party in the goods leases in ordinary course from a person in the business of selling or leasing goods of that kind but does not include a pawnbroker. “Leasing” may be for cash or by exchange of other property or on secured or unsecured credit and includes acquiring goods or documents of title under a preexisting lease contract but does not include a transfer in bulk or as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a money debt.

“Lessor” means a person who transfers the right to possession and use of goods under a lease. Unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the term includes a sublessor.

“Lessor’s residual interest” means the lessor’s interest in the goods after expiration, termination or cancellation of the lease contract.

“Lien” means a charge against or interest in goods to secure payment of a debt or performance of an obligation, but the term does not include a security interest.

“Lot” means a parcel or a single article that is the subject matter of a separate lease or delivery, whether or not it is sufficient to perform the lease contract.

“Merchant lessee” means a lessee that is a merchant with respect to goods of the kind subject to the lease.

“Present value” means the amount as of a date certain of one (1) or more sums payable in the future, discounted to the date certain. The discount is determined by the interest rate specified by the parties if the rate was not manifestly unreasonable at the time the transaction was entered into; otherwise, the discount is determined by a commercially reasonable rate that takes into account the facts and circumstances of each case at the time the transaction was entered into.

“Purchase” includes taking by sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, pledge, gift or any other voluntary transaction creating an interest in goods.

“Sublease” means a lease of goods the right to possession and use of which was acquired by the lessor as a lessee under an existing lease.

“Supplier” means a person from whom a lessor buys or leases goods to be leased under a finance lease.

“Supply contract” means a contract under which a lessor buys or leases goods to be leased.

“Termination” occurs when either party pursuant to a power created by agreement or law puts an end to the lease contract otherwise than for default.

Other definitions applying to this chapter and the sections in which they appear are:

The following definitions in other chapters apply to this chapter:

In addition, chapter 1, title 28, contains general definitions and principles of construction and interpretation applicable throughout this chapter.

a. Of the identity of the person supplying the goods to the lessor, unless the lessee has selected that person and directed the lessor to acquire the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods from that person;
b. That the lessee is entitled under this chapter to the promises and warranties, including those of any third party, provided to the lessor by the person supplying the goods in connection with or as part of the contract by which the lessor acquired the goods or the right to possession and use of the goods; and

c. That the lessee may communicate with the person supplying the goods to the lessor and receive an accurate and complete statement of those promises and warranties, including any disclaimers and limitations of them or of remedies.

“Accessions.” section 28-12-310(1), Idaho Code.

“Construction mortgage.” section 28-12-309(1)(d), Idaho Code.

“Encumbrance.” section 28-12-309(1)(e), Idaho Code.

“Fixtures.” section 28-12-309(1)(a), Idaho Code.

“Fixture filing.” section 28-12-309(1)(b), Idaho Code.

“Purchase money lease.” section 28-12-309(1)(c), Idaho Code.

“Account.” section 28-9-102(a)(2), Idaho Code.

“Between merchants.” section 28-2-104(3), Idaho Code.

“Buyer.” section 28-2-103(1)(a), Idaho Code.

“Chattel paper.” section 28-9-102(a)(11), Idaho Code.

“Consumer goods.” section 28-9-102(a)(23), Idaho Code.

“Document.” section 28-9-102(a)(30), Idaho Code.

“Entrusting.” section 28-2-403(3), Idaho Code.

“General intangible.” section 28-9-102(a)(42), Idaho Code.

“Good faith.” section 28-1-201(b)(20), Idaho Code.

“Instrument.” section 28-9-102(a)(47), Idaho Code.

“Merchant.” section 28-2-104(1), Idaho Code.

“Mortgage.” section 28-9-102(a)(55), Idaho Code.

“Pursuant to commitment.” section 28-9-102(a)(69), Idaho Code.

“Receipt.” section 28-2-103(1)(c), Idaho Code.

“Sale.” section 28-2-106(1), Idaho Code.

“Sale on approval.” section 28-2-326, Idaho Code.

“Sale or return.” section 28-2-326, Idaho Code.

“Seller.” section 28-2-103(1)(d), Idaho Code.

History.
I.C.,§ 28-12-103, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977; am. 2001, ch. 208, § 20, p. 704; am. 2004, ch. 42, § 15, p. 77; am. 2004, ch. 43, § 36, p. 136; am. 2012, ch. 145, § 21, p. 381.

§ 28-12-104. Leases subject to other law.

A lease, although subject to this chapter, is also subject to any applicable:

Certificate of title statute of this state; or

Certificate of title statute of another jurisdiction (section 28-12-105[, Idaho Code); or

Provision of the Idaho credit code.

In case of conflict between this chapter, other than sections 28-12-105, 28-12-304(3), and 28-12-305(3)[, Idaho Code], and a statute or decision referred to in subsection (1) of this section, the statute controls.

Failure to comply with an applicable law has only the effect specified therein.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-104, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977.

§ 28-12-105. Territorial application of article to goods covered by certificate of title.

Subject to the provisions of sections 28-12-304(3) and 28-12-305(3)[, Idaho Code], with respect to goods covered by a certificate of title issued under a statute of this state or of another jurisdiction, compliance and the effect of compliance or noncompliance with a certificate of title statute are governed by the law (including the conflict of laws rules) of the jurisdiction issuing the certificate until the earlier of:

Surrender of the certificate; or

Four (4) months after the goods are removed from that jurisdiction and thereafter until a new certificate of title is issued by another jurisdiction.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-105, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977.

§ 28-12-106. Limitation on power of parties to consumer lease to choose applicable law and judicial forum.

If the law chosen by the parties to a consumer lease is that of a jurisdiction other than a jurisdiction in which the lessee resides at the time the lease agreement becomes enforceable or within thirty (30) days thereafter or in which the goods are to be used, the choice is not enforceable.

If the judicial forum chosen by the parties to a consumer lease is a forum that would not otherwise have jurisdiction over the lessee, the choice is not enforceable.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-106, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977.

§ 28-12-107. Waiver or renunciation of claim or right after default.

Any claim or right arising out of an alleged default or breach of warranty may be discharged in whole or in part without consideration by a written waiver or renunciation signed and delivered by the aggrieved party.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-107, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977.

§ 28-12-108. Unconscionability.

If the court as a matter of law finds a lease contract or any clause of a lease contract to have been unconscionable at the time it was made the court may refuse to enforce the lease contract, or it may enforce the remainder of the lease contract without the unconscionable clause, or it may so limit the application of any unconscionable clause as to avoid any unconscionable result.

With respect to a consumer lease, if the court as a matter of law finds that a lease contract, or any clause of a lease contract, has been induced by unconscionable conduct or that unconscionable conduct has occurred in the collection of a claim arising from a lease contract, the court may grant appropriate relief.

Before making a finding of unconscionability under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the court, on its own motion or that of a party, shall afford the parties a reasonable opportunity to present evidence as to the setting, purpose and effect of the lease contract or clause thereof, or of the conduct.

In an action in which the lessee claims unconscionability with respect to a consumer lease:

If the court finds unconscionability under subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the lessee.

If the court does not find unconscionability and the lessee claiming unconscionability has brought or maintained an action he knew to be groundless, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees to the party against whom the claim is made.

In determining attorney’s fees, the amount of the recovery on behalf of the claimant under subsections (1) and (2) of this section is not controlling.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-108, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977.

§ 28-12-109. Option to accelerate at will.

A term providing that one (1) party or his successor in interest may accelerate payment or performance or require collateral or additional collateral “at will” or “when he deems himself insecure” or in words of similar import must be construed to mean that he has power to do so only if he in good faith believes that the prospect of payment or performance is impaired.

With respect to a consumer lease, the burden of establishing good faith under subsection (1) of this section is on the party who exercised the power; otherwise the burden of establishing lack of good faith is on the party against whom the power has been exercised.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-12-109, as added by 1993, ch. 287, § 1, p. 977.